Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1312
Arbitration board; meetings; chairperson; disputed issues.

The arbitration board shall meet within thirty days of the appointment of the third arbitrator. The third arbitrator shall be the chairperson and preside at all meetings and hearings of the arbitration board and shall provide notice to the parties at least five days before the first meeting. The parties shall meet with the arbitration board at its first meeting for the purpose of clarifying and narrowing the specific issues from those set forth in the detailed statement of disputed issues.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 12.